test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-vaesuemae74_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - väsümä: # Verb (74) väsümä 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     väsümä+V+Inf/mA: väsümä
     väsümä+V+Inf: vässüq
     väsümä+V+Act+PrfPrc: väsünüq
     väsümä+V+Pss+PrfPrc: [väsüt, väsütü]

     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: väsü
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [väsüt, väsüdeq]
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: väsüs
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: väsümiq
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: väsütiq
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: väsüseq
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: väsü
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vässü
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [vässüt, vässüq, vässüdeq]
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vässü
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vässümiq
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vässütiq
     väsümä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [vässüq, vässüväq]

     väsümä+V+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3: väsütäs

     väsümä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: vässüv

     väsümä+V+Jus: väsüguq
